Utah statutes.
26-1-39.   Health System Reform Demonstration Projects.

The department may coordinate with the Insurance Department and periodically convene health care providers, payers, and consumers, who elect to participate in a demonstration project under Section 31A-22-614.6, to monitor the progress being made regarding demonstration projects for health care delivery and payment reform under Section 31A-22-614.6.

